New York, session 2025-2026, A6328.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph b of subdivision 2 and subdivision 3 of section 2 3-301 of the village law, paragraph b of subdivision 2 as amended by 3 chapter 735 of the laws of 1983, are amended to read as follows: 4 b. assessor or assessors, provided, however, that the board of trus- 5 tees by resolution or local law may consolidate the offices of clerk, 6 treasurer, and assessor or any two of such offices. [The board of trus- 7 tees may also determine, by local law or resolution, that such board of 8 trustees shall act as the board of assessors or may appoint such board 9 from their members.] Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this 10 paragraph, a village which has enacted a local law as provided in subdi- 11 vision three of section fourteen hundred two of the real property tax 12 law shall not have an assessor or assessors in any year in which such 13 local law is in effect. 14 3. The mayor, trustees and village justices shall be elective offi- 15 cers. All other officers shall be appointed by the mayor, subject to 16 the approval of the board of trustees; provided, however, no member of 17 the board of trustees or mayor shall be appointed a member of the board 18 of assessors for the same village. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 20 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, 21 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 22 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 23 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04762-01-5